New Jersey, session 222, S4318.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  There is appropriated from the Property Tax Relief Fund such amounts, not to exceed $50,000,000 as determined by the Commissioner of Education and subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, as necessary to support a qualifying school districts increase to the adjusted tax levy for the 2026-2027 school year that results from implementing the allowable adjustment to the tax levy for increases in health care costs pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection d. of section 3 of P.L.2007, c.62 (C.18A:7F-38).  Funds received by a qualifying school district pursuant to this section shall be the product of the amount of funds, not to exceed $50,000,000, determined to be available for the purposes of this section and the districts proportionate share of the Statewide total increase in health care costs among all school districts. b.  As used in this section, qualifying school district means a school district with an adjusted tax levy in the 2026-2027 school year that has increased by more than 9.9 percent of the adjusted tax levy implemented for the district in the 2024-2025 school year. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.